Missouri, session 2026, SB1265.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 67.307, 285.530, and 577.675, RSMo,
are repealed and four new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to
be known as sections 67.307, 285.530, 577.675, and 590.250, to
read as follows:
67.307. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Law enforcement officer", a sheriff or peace
officer of a municipality with the duty and power of arrest
for violation of the general criminal laws of the state or
for violation of ordinances of municipalities;
(2) "Municipality", any county, city, town, or village;
(3) "Municipality official", any elected or appointed
official or any law enforcement officer serving the
municipality;
(4) "Sanctuary policy", any municipality's order or
ordinance, enacted or followed that:
(a) Limits or prohibits any municipality official or
person employed by the municipality from communicating or
cooperating with federal agencies or officials to verify or
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1265 2
report the immigration status of any alien within such
municipality; or
(b) Grants to illegal aliens the right to lawful
presence or status within the municipality in violation of
federal law.
2. (1) No municipality shall enact or adopt any
sanctuary policy. Any municipality that enacts or adopts a
sanctuary policy:
(a) Shall be ineligible for any moneys provided
through grants administered by any state agency or
department until the sanctuary policy is repealed or is no
longer in effect; and
(b) Shall be subject to a fine of twenty-five thousand
five hundred dollars for each day on which the municipality
has such sanctuary policy in effect.
(2) Upon the complaint of any state resident regarding
a specific government entity, agency, or political
subdivision of this state or prior to the provision of funds
or awarding of any grants to a government entity, agency, or
political subdivision of this state, any member of the
general assembly may request that the attorney general of
the state of Missouri issue an opinion stating whether the
government entity, agency, or political subdivision has
current policies in contravention of this section.
3. The governing body, sheriff, or chief of police of
each municipality shall provide each law enforcement officer
with written notice of their duty to cooperate with state
and federal agencies and officials on matters pertaining to
enforcement of state and federal laws governing immigration.
4. This section shall become effective on January 1,
2009.

SB 1265 3
285.530. 1. No business entity or employer shall
knowingly employ, hire for employment, or continue to employ
an unauthorized alien to perform work within the state of
Missouri.
2. As a condition for the award of any contract or
grant in excess of five thousand dollars by the state or by
any political subdivision of the state to a business entity,
or for any business entity receiving a state-administered or
subsidized tax credit, tax abatement, or loan from the
state, the business entity shall, by sworn affidavit and
provision of documentation, affirm its enrollment and
participation in a federal work authorization program with
respect to the employees working in connection with the
contracted services. Every such business entity shall also
sign an affidavit affirming that it does not knowingly
employ any person who is an unauthorized alien in connection
with the contracted services. Any entity contracting with
the state or any political subdivision of the state shall
only be required to provide the affidavits required in this
subsection to the state and any political subdivision of the
state with which it contracts, on an annual basis. During
or immediately after an emergency, the requirements of this
subsection that a business entity enroll and participate in
a federal work authorization program shall be suspended for
fifteen working days. As used in this subsection,
"emergency" includes the following natural and manmade
disasters: major snow and ice storms, floods, tornadoes,
severe weather, earthquakes, hazardous material incidents,
nuclear power plant accidents, other radiological hazards,
and major mechanical failures of a public utility facility.
3. All [public] employers shall enroll and actively
participate in a federal work authorization program.

SB 1265 4
4. An employer [may enroll and participate in a
federal work authorization program and] shall verify the
employment eligibility of every employee in the employer's
hire whose employment commences after the employer enrolls
in a federal work authorization program. The employer shall
retain a copy of the dated verification report received from
the federal government. Any business entity that
participates in such program shall have an affirmative
defense that such business entity has not violated
subsection 1 of this section.
5. A general contractor or subcontractor of any tier
shall not be liable under sections 285.525 to 285.550 when
such general contractor or subcontractor contracts with its
direct subcontractor who violates subsection 1 of this
section, if the contract binding the contractor and
subcontractor affirmatively states that the direct
subcontractor is not knowingly in violation of subsection 1
of this section and shall not henceforth be in such
violation and the contractor or subcontractor receives a
sworn affidavit under the penalty of perjury attesting to
the fact that the direct subcontractor's employees are
lawfully present in the United States.
577.675. 1. A person commits the offense of
transportation, concealment, or inducement of an illegal
alien if he or she knowingly:
(1) Transports, moves, or attempts to transport or
move any illegal alien;
(2) Conceals, harbors, or shields or attempts to
conceal, harbor, or shield an illegal alien from detection
in any place in this state, including any building or any
means of transportation, if the person knows or recklessly

SB 1265 5
disregards the fact that the alien has come to, has entered,
or remains in the United States in violation of law; or
(3) Encourages or induces an illegal alien to come to
or reside in this state.
2. For purposes of this section, the term "illegal
alien" means any illegal alien who is not lawfully present
in the United States, according to the terms of 8 U.S.C.
Section 1101, et seq., for the purposes of trafficking in
violation of sections 566.200 to 566.215, drug trafficking
in violation of sections 579.065 and 579.068, prostitution
in violation of chapter 567, or employment.
[2.] 3. The offense of transportation, concealment, or
inducement of an illegal alien is a class D felony.
[3.] 4. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
deny any victim of an offense under sections 566.200 to
566.215 of rights afforded by the federal Trafficking
Victims Protection Act of 2000, Public Law 106-386, as
amended.
590.250. Any law enforcement officer or agency may
enforce the provisions of immigration law found in Title 8
of the United States Code that establish criminal penalties.
✓